Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 10. Limitations of Actions.

Collateral references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d, Criminal Law, § 247 et seq.

22 C.J.S., Criminal Law,
§ 250 et seq.

Sec. 12.10.010.
General time limitations.

Prosecution for the following offenses may be commenced at any time:

murder;

attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit murder or hindering the prosecution of murder;

felony sexual abuse of a minor;

sexual assault that is an unclassified, class A, or class B felony or a violation of AS

11.41.425

(a)(2) — (4);

a violation of AS

11.41.425

,

11.41.427

,

11.41.450

—

11.41.458

, AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.130

, or former AS

11.41.430

, when committed against a person who, at the time of the offense, was under 18 years of age;

kidnapping;

distribution of child pornography in violation of AS

11.61.125

;

sex trafficking in violation of AS

11.66.110

—

11.66.130

that is an unclassified, class A, or class B felony or that is committed against a person who, at the time of the offense, was under 20 years of age;

human trafficking in violation of AS

11.41.360

or

11.41.365

.

Except as otherwise provided by law or in (a) of this section, a person may not be prosecuted, tried, or punished for an offense unless the indictment is found or the information or complaint is instituted not later than

10 years after the commission of a felony offense in violation of AS

11.41.120

—

11.41.330

,

11.41.425(a)(1)

,

11.41.425(a)(5)

,

11.41.425(a)(6)

, or

11.41.450

—

11.41.458

; or

five years after the commission of any other offense.

History.

(§ 1.02 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1962; am § 19 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 2001; am § 18 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 15 ch 20 SLA 2011; am § 11 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective July 1, 2007, added paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(6), and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(4), substituted “AS

11.41.425(a)(2)

—(4)” for “AS

11.41.425(a)(2)

or (3).”

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a), added (7), (8), and (9); rewrote (b)(1), which read, “10 years after the commission of a felony offense in violation of AS

11.41.120

—

11.41.370

,

11.41.425(a)

, or

11.41.450

—

11.41.458

; or”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(b), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that the 2007 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to acts committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Sec. 12.10.020.
Specific time limitation.

Even if the general time limitation has expired, a prosecution for any offense that includes a material element of fraud or breach of fiduciary obligation may be commenced within one year after the discovery of the offense by an aggrieved party or by a person who has legal capacity to represent an aggrieved party or a legal duty to report the offense and who is not a party to the offense, but in no case shall this provision extend the period of limitation otherwise applicable by more than three years.

Even if the general time limitation has expired, a prosecution for any offense based upon misconduct in office by a public officer or employee may be commenced within one year after discovery of the offense by a person having a duty to report such offense, but in no case shall this provision extend the period of limitation otherwise applicable by more than three years.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 86 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 1.03 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 7 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 39 SLA 1985; am § 20 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 81 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 2001)

Sec. 12.10.030.
When period of limitation runs.

An offense is committed either when every element occurs, or, if a legislative purpose to prohibit a continuing course of conduct plainly appears, at the time when the course of conduct or the defendant’s complicity therein is terminated. Time starts to run on the day after the offense is committed.

A prosecution is commenced either when an indictment is found or when a warrant is issued, provided that such warrant is executed without unreasonable delay.

History.

(§ 1.04 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.10.040.
When period of limitation does not run.

The period of limitation does not run during any time when the accused, with a purpose to avoid detection, apprehension, or prosecution, is outside the state or is absent from the accused’s usual place of abode within the state, but in no case shall this provision extend the period of limitation otherwise applicable by more than three years.

The period of limitation does not run during any time when a prosecution against the accused for the same conduct is pending in this state.

History.

(§ 1.05 ch 34 SLA 1962)